Washington statutes.
RCW 35.102.145

Municipal business and occupation tax—Confidentiality, privilege, and disclosure.

A city that imposes a business and occupation tax may by ordinance provide that return or tax information is confidential, privileged, and subject to disclosure in the manner provided by RCW 82.32.330.

[ 2010 c 106 s 101.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 106: "Except as otherwise provided in sections 401, 409, and 412 of this act, this act takes effect July 1, 2010." [ 2010 c 106 s 407.]